Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.870

Discontinuing judicial retirement account plan contributions—Additional benefit—One-time irrevocable election—Justices and judges.

(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of plan 3 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with the member's employer, the department, and the administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional plan 3 defined benefit equal to six-tenths percent of average final compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of the election in lieu of future employer contributions to the judicial retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW.

(2) A member who made the election under subsection (1) of this section may apply, at the time of filing a written application for retirement with the department, to the department to increase the member's benefit multiplier by six-tenths percent per year of service for the period in which the member served as a justice or judge prior to the election. The member may purchase, beginning with the most recent judicial service, the higher benefit multiplier for that portion of the member's prior judicial service for which the higher benefit multiplier was not previously purchased, and that would ensure that the member has no more than a thirty-seven and one-half percent of average final compensation benefit. The member shall pay two and one-half percent of the salary earned for each month of service for which the higher benefit multiplier is being purchased, plus five and one-half percent interest applied from the dates that the service was earned. The purchase price shall not exceed the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier. This payment must be made prior to retirement, subject to rules adopted by the department.

(3) From January 1, 2009, through June 30, 2009, the following members may apply to the department to increase their benefit multiplier by an additional six-tenths percent per year of service for the period in which they served as a justice or judge:

(a) Active members of plan 3 who are not currently employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, and who have past service as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge; and

(b) Inactive vested members of plan 3 who have separated, have not yet retired, and who have past service as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge.

A member eligible under this subsection may purchase the higher benefit multiplier for all or part of the member's prior judicial service beginning with the most recent judicial service. The member shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier as determined by the director.

(4) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

(5) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection (1) of this section shall contribute a minimum of seven and one-half percent of pay to the member's defined contribution account.

[ 2008 c 300 s 3; 2007 c 123 s 3; 2006 c 189 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.